Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 16.1 State Contractors with Private Employers Providing Service Personnel

36-16.1-1.
State employment contracts with private employers — Prohibitions.

No agreement or contract with a private employer to provide personnel to the state or the Rhode Island public transit authority to perform services at a state owned or operated facility, or a facility owned or operated by the Rhode Island public transit authority which at the time of enactment of this statute were being performed by state employees, or employees of the Rhode Island public transit authority shall be entered into or given by the state or the Rhode Island public transit authority unless the contract or agreement contains a stipulation requiring prescribed rates of wages as determined by the director of the department of labor and training. The rates of wages to be paid the various classes of service employees in the performance of the contract or any subcontract thereunder shall be based upon the prevailing rates for employment in the state or if the contract is entered into by the Rhode Island public transit authority, the prevailing rates for Rhode Island public transit authority employees. The rates of wages to be paid the various classes of service employees in the performance of the contract or any subcontract thereunder shall be based upon the prevailing rates for employment in the state. The rates of wages shall be furnished by the director in a schedule containing the classification of jobs and rate of wages to be paid for each job. It shall include payments to health, welfare, and retirement plans, or, if no such plan is in effect between the employees and the private employer, the amount of payments shall be paid directly to the employees; provided; however, that where limited period positions are utilized to replace persons on leave of absence, employees in the limited period positions shall not be covered by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 122, § 1.

36-16.1-2.
Void contracts.

Any agreement or contract which is made contrary to or in violation of the provisions of §

36-16.1-1

shall be null and void, shall have no force and effect, and no payment thereunder shall be made by the state or the Rhode Island public transit authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 122, § 1.

36-16.1-3.
Prison labor.

The provisions of §§

36-16.1-1

and

36-16.1-2

shall not apply to the use of inmate labor which is provided to any state department and is performed at a state owned or operated facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 24, § 2.